Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the hiring of presidents at public institutions of higher education is a matter of public interest. To further this interest, the legislature intends to ensure that the top leadership of Washington's public institutions of higher education is selected in a manner that reflects principles of academic partnership with faculty, staff, and students through full participation of faculty and staff regents and trustees.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.20.100 and 2022 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested in a board of regents to consist of 11 members, one of whom shall be a student and one of whom shall be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty.(b) The members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for the student member and faculty member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified.(c) The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. The student member shall hold the office for a term of one year from the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year or until a successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.(d) The governor shall select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least two and not more than five, submitted by the faculty senate. The faculty member shall hold the office for a term of three years from the first day of October and until a successor is appointed and qualified.(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.(3) Except for the term of the student member and the faculty member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.(4) ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of university president, a student appointed under this section may not participate or vote on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel. ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of university president, a faculty member appointed under this section may not participate or vote on matters related to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of specific faculty members.Sec. 3. RCW 28B.30.100 and 2022 c 12 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The governance of Washington State University shall be vested in a board of regents to consist of 11 members, one of whom shall be a student and one of whom shall be a full-time or emeritus member of the faculty.(b) The members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for the student member and faculty member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified.(c) The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. The student member shall hold the office for a term of one year from the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year or until a successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university at the time of appointment.(d) The governor shall select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least two and not more than five, submitted by the faculty senate. The faculty member shall hold the office for a term of three years from the first day of October and until a successor is appointed and qualified.(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy or when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the regent whose office has become vacant or expired.(3) Except for the term of the student member and the faculty member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.(4) Each regent shall, before entering upon the discharge of his respective duties as such, execute a good and sufficient bond to the state of Washington, with two or more sufficient sureties, residents of the state, or with a surety company licensed to do business within the state, in the penal sum of not less than five thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as such regent: PROVIDED, That the university shall pay any fees incurred for any such bonds for their board members.(5) ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of university president, a student appointed under this section may not participate or vote on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel. ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of university president, a faculty member appointed under this section may not participate or vote on matters related to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of specific faculty members.Sec. 4. RCW 28B.35.100 and 2006 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governance of each of the regional universities shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the respective university at the time of appointment.(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.(4) ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of regional university president, a student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.Sec. 5. RCW 28B.40.100 and 2006 c 78 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the student body. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day of July and until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the college at the time of appointment.(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose office has become vacant or expired.(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of September in any one year.(4) ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of state college president, a student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.Sec. 6. RCW 28B.50.102 and 2012 c 148 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Boards of trustees for each college district, by majority vote, may establish a sixth trustee that shall be filled by a student. The governor shall select each student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the associated student governments or their equivalent of the college district. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year, beginning July 1st and ending June 30th, or until the student member's successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at a college within the college district at the time of appointment and throughout the student's term. If the student member fails to be enrolled at the college full-time or forfeits his or her academic standing, the student member is disqualified and a new student member must be appointed.(2) ((A))With the exception of the initial selection and hiring of the position of president, a student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring, discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel or any other matters pertaining to collective bargaining agreements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---